New York, session 2025-2026, S85.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 50 of the legislative law, as added by chapter 503 2 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 50. Fiscal note in retirement bills. A bill which enacts or amends 4 any provision of law relating to a retirement system or plan of the 5 state of New York or of any of its political subdivisions shall contain 6 a fiscal note stating the estimated annual cost to the employer affected 7 and the source of such estimate, and a statement identifying the indi- 8 vidual or entity that provided compensation to the source of such esti- 9 mate, if any. 10 § 2. Section 51 of the legislative law, as added by chapter 985 of the 11 laws of 1983, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 51. Fiscal impact notes on bills affecting political subdivisions. 13 1. For the purpose of this section, the term "political subdivision" 14 means any county, city, town, village, hamlet, special district [or], 15 school district, college, university or any state agency, department, 16 office, commission, bureau or public authority. As used in this section, 17 special district shall mean a district possessing the power to contract 18 indebtedness and levy or require the taxes or benefit assessments upon 19 real property. 20 2. [The legislature shall by concurrent resolution of the senate and 21 assembly prescribe rules requiring fiscal notes to accompany, on a sepa- 22 rate form, bills and amendments to bills, except as otherwise prescribed EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00631-01-5 S. 85 2 1 by such rules,] Prior to discharging a bill which would substantially 2 affect the revenues or expenses, or both, by at least two hundred fifty 3 thousand dollars, of any political subdivision, all standing legislative 4 committees shall prepare a fiscal note for each such bill. Such fiscal 5 note shall be included in such bill and detail the following: 6 (a) an estimated cost or savings to the state and affected political 7 subdivision for the five years following adoption of such bill; and 8 (b) the source of the estimate described in paragraph (a) of this 9 subdivision and a statement identifying any individual or entity that 10 provided compensation to the source of such estimate, if any. 11 3. The fiscal impacts described in such fiscal notes shall be esti- 12 mated on a basis of any one or more of the following: 13 (a) individual political subdivisions; or 14 (b) aggregates of political subdivisions (i) statewide or by lesser 15 geographic area, or (ii) by classification or subclassification or rele- 16 vant characteristics; or 17 (c) representative political subdivisions with relevant character- 18 istics thereof quantitatively set forth e.g. population, area, weighed 19 average daily attendance of pupils. 20 4. Fiscal note measurements shall be made in units of money, personal 21 services, equipment, or any other appropriate, convenient or accessible 22 units of measurement. 23 5. The sponsor of such bill or the chair or ranking member of any 24 standing legislative committee are authorized to prepare such fiscal 25 note in collaboration with the division of the budget or the department 26 or agency of state government charged with the fiscal duties, functions 27 or powers provided in such bill. 28 Officers of executive branch entities shall process requests for 29 assistance in preparing fiscal notes on a first-come, first-serve basis, 30 except priority shall be given to processing requests for assistance in 31 preparing fiscal notes from the chairs or ranking members of the senate 32 finance committee or assembly ways and means committee. 33 [3.] 6. Fiscal notes shall not, however, be required for bills: (a) 34 subject to the provisions of section fifty of this [chapter] article, or 35 (b) accompanied by special home rule requests submitted by political 36 subdivisions, or (c) which provide discretionary authority to political 37 subdivisions, or (d) submitted pursuant to section twenty-four of the 38 state finance law. 39 [4.] 7. If the estimate or estimates contained in a fiscal note are 40 inaccurate, such inaccuracies shall not affect, impair or invalidate 41 such bill. 42 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 43 have become a law.